lt-LT: Stalo ledo ritulio dalies tipas: Guolis; Gnybtas; Spaustukas; Pavarų dėžė; Vartininkas; Apšvietimo juosta; Variklis; Tinklelis; Žaidėjas; Maitinimo blokas; Strypas; Rezultatų skaičiuoklė; Jutiklis; Tarpiklis; Suklys / velenėlis; Lazda; Komandos rinkinys; Ratukas; Kita
hr-HR: Vrsta dijela za stolni hokej: Ležaj; Stezaljka; Kopča; Prijenosnik; Vratar; Svjetlosna traka; Motor; Mreža; Igrač; Paket napajanja; Šipka; Jedinica za bodovanje; Senzor; Podloška; Vreteno; Palica; Komplet momčadi; Kotač; Ostalo
fi: Pöytäkiekon osan tyyppi: Laakeri; Puristin; Kiinnike; Vaihteisto; Maalivahti; Valonauha; Moottori; Verkko; Pelaaja; Virtalähde; Tanko; Pisteenlaskuyksikkö; Anturi; Välilevy; Kara; Maila; Joukkuesarja; Pyörä; Muu
sv: Typ av del för bordshockey: Lager; Klämma; Clips; Växellåda; Målvakt; Ljuslist; Motor; Nät; Spelare; Nätaggregat; Stång; Poängräknare; Sensor; Mellanlägg; Spindel; Klubba; Laguppsättning; Hjul; Annan
pl: Typ części do hokeja stołowego: Łożysko; Zacisk; Klips; Przekładnia; Bramkarz; Taśma LED; Silnik; Siatka; Zawodnik; Zasilacz; Prowadnica; Licznik punktów; Czujnik; Podkładka regulacyjna; Wrzeciono; Kij; Zestaw drużynowy; Kółko; Inny
hu: Hokiasztal alkatrészének típusa: Csapágy; Rögzítő; Klipsz; Hajtómű; Kapus; Fényszalag; Motor; Háló; Játékos; Tápegység; Rúd; Pontszámláló; Érzékelő; Hézagoló; Tengely; Ütő; Csapatkészlet; Kerék; Egyéb
de: Art des Tischhockey-Teils: Lager; Klemme; Clip; Getriebe; Torwart; Leuchtband; Motor; Netz; Spieler; Netzteil; Stange; Zähleinheit; Sensor; Unterlegscheibe; Spindel; Schläger; Team-Set; Rad; Sonstige
cs: Typ dílu stolního hokeje: Ložisko; Svorka; Spona; Převodovka; Brankář; Světelný pás; Motor; Síťka; Hráč; Napájecí zdroj; Tyč; Bodovací jednotka; Senzor; Podložka; Osa; Hokejka; Týmová sada; Kolo; Jiné
en: Table hockey part type: Bearing; Clamp; Clip; Gearbox; Goalie; Lighting strip; Motor; Net; Player; Power pack; Rod; Score unit; Sensor; Shim; Spindle; Stick; Team set; Wheel; Other
it: Tipo di parte dell'hockey da tavolo: Cuscinetto; Morsetto; Clip; Scatola degli ingranaggi; Portiere; Striscia luminosa; Motore; Rete; Giocatore; Alimentatore; Asta; Segnapunti; Sensore; Spessore; Mandrino; Stecca; Set squadra; Ruota; Altro
ko: 테이블 하키 부품 유형: 베어링; 클램프; 클립; 기어박스; 골리; 조명 스트립; 모터; 네트; 플레이어; 파워 팩; 로드; 점수판 유닛; 센서; 심; 스핀들; 스틱; 팀 세트; 휠; 기타
el: Τύπος εξαρτήματος επιτραπέζιου χόκεϊ: Ρουλεμάν; Σφιγκτήρας; Κλιπ; Κιβώτιο γραναζιών; Τερματοφύλακας; Ταινία φωτισμού; Μοτέρ; Δίχτυ; Παίκτης; Τροφοδοτικό; Ράβδος; Μονάδα σκορ; Αισθητήρας; Αποστάτης; Άξονας; Μπαστούνι; Σετ ομάδας; Τροχός; Άλλο
th: ประเภทชิ้นส่วนฮอกกี้โต๊ะ: ตลับลูกปืน; แคลมป์; คลิป; กระปุกเกียร์; ผู้รักษาประตู; แถบไฟ; มอเตอร์; ตาข่าย; ผู้เล่น; ชุดแบตเตอรี่; ก้าน; ชุดนับคะแนน; เซนเซอร์; แผ่นชิม; แกนหมุน; ไม้; ชุดผู้เล่น; ล้อ; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Typ dielu stolného hokeja: Ložisko; Svorka; Spona; Prevodovka; Brankár; Svetelný pás; Motor; Sieť; Hráč; Napájací zdroj; Tyč; Počítadlo skóre; Senzor; Podložka; Vreteno; Hokejka; Tímová súprava; Koliesko; Iný
ja: テーブルホッケー部品タイプ: ベアリング; クランプ; クリップ; ギアボックス; ゴーリー; ライティングストリップ; モーター; ネット; プレイヤー; パワーパック; ロッド; スコアユニット; センサー; シム; スピンドル; スティック; チームセット; ホイール; その他
fr: Type de pièce pour hockey sur table: Roulement; Pince; Clip; Boîte de vitesses; Gardien de but; Bande lumineuse; Moteur; Filet; Joueur; Bloc d’alimentation; Tige; Unité de pointage; Capteur; Cale; Axe; Bâton; Ensemble d’équipe; Roue; Autre
es: Tipo de pieza de hockey de mesa: Rodamiento; Abrazadera; Clip; Caja de engranajes; Portero; Tira de iluminación; Motor; Red; Jugador; Fuente de alimentación; Varilla; Unidad de puntuación; Sensor; Calce; Eje; Palo; Set de equipo; Rueda; Otra
ro-RO: Tipul de piesă pentru hochei de masă: Rulment; Clemă; Clips; Reductor; Portar; Bandă luminoasă; Motor; Plasă; Jucător; Sursă de alimentare; Tijă; Unitate de scor; Senzor; Distanțier; Ax; Crosă; Set echipă; Roată; Altele
bg-BG: Тип част за маса за хокей: Лагер; Скоба; Щипка; Предавателна кутия; Вратар; Светеща лента; Двигател; Мрежа; Играч; Захранващ блок; Пръчка; Табло за резултат; Сензор; Подложка; Ос; Стик; Комплект отбор; Колело; Друго
da: Reservedelstype for bordhockey: Leje; Klemme; Clips; Gearkasse; Målmand; Lysstrimmel; Motor; Net; Spiller; Strømforsyning; Stang; Resultattavle; Sensor; Mellemlægsskive; Spindel; Stav; Holdsæt; Hjul; Andet
tr: Masa hokeyi parça tipi: Rulman; Kelepçe; Klips; Dişli kutusu; Kaleci; Işık şeridi; Motor; File; Oyuncu; Güç kaynağı; Çubuk; Skor ünitesi; Sensör; Şim; Mil; Sopa; Takım seti; Tekerlek; Diğer
zh-TW: 桌上曲棍球零件類型: 軸承; 夾具; 夾扣; 齒輪箱; 守門員; 燈條; 馬達; 球網; 球員; 電源供應器; 操作桿; 計分器; 感應器; 墊片; 主軸; 球桿; 球隊套組; 輪子; 其他
pt-BR: Hóquei de mesa tipo de peça: Rolamento; Braçadeira; Clipe; Caixa de engrenagem; Goleiro; Faixa de iluminação; Motor; Rede; Jogador; Fonte de alimentação; Haste; Unidade de pontuação; Sensor; Calço; Eixo; Taco; Conjunto da equipe; Roda; Outra
sl-SI: Vrsta dela za namizni hokej: Ležaj; Sponka; Zaponka; Menjalnik; Vratar; Svetlobni trak; Motor; Mreža; Igralec; Napajalnik; Palica; Enota za rezultat; Senzor; Podložka; Os / Vreteno; Hokejska palica; Komplet ekipe; Kolo; Drugo
zh-CN: 桌面冰球部件类型: 轴承; 夹具; 卡扣; 齿轮箱; 守门员; 灯条; 电机; 球网; 球员; 电源组; 操纵杆; 计分装置; 传感器; 垫片; 轴; 球杆; 球队套装; 轮子; 其他
nb: Deltype for bordhockey: Lager; Klemme; Klips; Girkasse; Målvakt; Lysstripe; Motor; Nett; Spiller; Strømforsyning; Stang; Poengtavle; Sensor; Mellomlegg; Spindel; Kølle; Lagsett; Hjul; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de peça de hóquei de mesa: Rolamento; Braçadeira; Clipe; Caixa de velocidades; Guarda-redes; Tira de iluminação; Motor; Rede; Jogador; Bateria; Haste; Unidade de pontuação; Sensor; Calço; Veio; Taco; Conjunto de equipa; Roda; Outro
vi: Loại phụ tùng khúc côn cầu bàn: Vòng bi; Kẹp; Kẹp gài; Hộp số; Thủ môn; Dải đèn; Động cơ; Lưới; Người chơi; Bộ nguồn; Cần điều khiển; Thiết bị tính điểm; Cảm biến; Miếng chêm; Trục chính; Gậy; Đội hình; Bánh xe; Khác
ru: Тип детали настольного хоккея: Подшипник; Зажим; Клипса; Редуктор; Вратарь; Световая полоса; Мотор; Сетка; Игрок; Блок питания; Шток; Блок счета; Датчик; Прокладка; Шпиндель; Клюшка; Комплект команды; Колесо; Другое
nl: Tafelhockey onderdeeltype: Lager; Klem; Clip; Tandwielkast; Keeper; Lichtstrip; Motor; Net; Speler; Voeding; Stang; Score-unit; Sensor; Vulplaatje; Spindel; Stick; Teamset; Wiel; Overig